Massachusetts, session 194th, H1742.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 85K of Chapter 231 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out the 
first sentence of the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following sentence: 
It shall not constitute a defense to any cause of action based on tort brought against a 
corporation, trustees of a trust, or members of an association that said corporation, trust or 
association is or at the time the cause of action arose was a charity; provided, that if the tort was 
committed in the course of any activity carried on to accomplish directly the charitable purposes 
of such corporation, trust or association, and such corporation, trust or association derives more 
than fifty percent of its income from charitable gifts or donations, then liability in any such cause 
of action shall not exceed the sum of twenty thousand dollars, exclusive of interest and costs.